Florida, session 2026, SB518.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSection 487.082, Florida Statutes, is created to 12 read: 13 487.082âProducts liability actions.âA products liability 14 action under this part based on a failure to warn may not be 15 brought or maintained with respect to any pesticide registered 16 with the United States Environmental Protection Agency under the 17 Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (FIFRA), 7 18 U.S.C. ss. 136 et seq., if the label for such pesticide is: 19 (1)âApproved by the United States Environmental Protection 20 Agency; 21 (2)âConsistent with the most recent human health risk 22 assessment performed under FIFRA; or 23 (3)âConsistent with the United States Environmental 24 Protection Agencyâs carcinogenicity classification of the 25 pesticide under FIFRA. 26 27 However, this section does not shield from liability a 28 manufacturer that the United States Environmental Protection 29 Agency determines knowingly withheld, concealed, misrepresented, 30 or destroyed material information regarding the human health 31 risks or carcinogenicity of a pesticide in order to obtain or 32 maintain approval of the label for the pesticide by the United 33 States Environmental Protection Agency. 34 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.